Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Chapter 17 Tennessee Nonprofit Gaming Law
“(d) “(1) “(A) An authorized annual event shall be held within twenty-eight (28) calendar days of the event date listed in the annual event application; provided, that for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2011, and ending June 30, 2012, an authorized annual event shall be held within forty-five (45) calendar days of the event date listed in the annual event application; provided further, that nothing in this subdivision (d)(1) shall be construed as allowing two (2) annual events in any one-year period or as allowing a nonprofit organization to operate an annual event at authorized multiple locations on separate days.

“(B) A nonprofit organization shall give notice to each chief law enforcement officer of the county or municipality in which the annual event shall be conducted one hundred thirty (130) days prior to the event date listed in the annual event application; provided, that if the event date is within one hundred thirty (130) days from notification of authorization to conduct an annual event, the nonprofit organization shall immediately, upon receipt of such notification and prior to the commencement of selling any tickets, shares, chances or similar records, give notice to the chief law enforcement officer of each county or municipality in which the annual event shall be conducted. In accordance with subdivision (d)(1)(A), if the actual event date is different than the event date listed in the annual event application, a nonprofit organization shall give an additional notice to each chief law enforcement officer of the county or municipality in which the annual event shall be conducted prior to conducting the annual event. For the purposes of this subdivision (d)(1)(B), “notice” means a letter sent by certified mail, or by actual physical delivery of a letter to the chief law enforcement officer or such officer's designee, containing, at a minimum, the following information:

“(i) The name of the nonprofit organization;

“(ii) The name of the event;

“(iii) The location of the event, including the physical address where the annual event will be conducted;

“(iv) The type of lottery game to be conducted;

“(v) The event date for the event listed in the annual event application;

“(vi) If applicable, the actual event date for the annual event if different than the event date listed in the annual event application;

“(vii) If applicable, additional locations of the event, including the physical address where the annual event will be conducted, if such event will be operated at authorized multiple locations;

“(viii) The name, address and telephone number of the nonprofit organization's chair, president or chief administrative officer; and

“(ix) If applicable, the name, address and telephone number of the person responsible for the operation of the annual event for the nonprofit organization, if different than the organization's chair, president or chief administrative officer.

“(2) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(3), upon receipt of authorization from the secretary pursuant to subsection (c), a nonprofit organization may conduct all necessary activities for such event including, but not limited to, planning, advertising, promoting, printing of materials and tickets, shares, chances or similar records and the transportation of such records and other devices.

“(3) A nonprofit organization, or any person authorized pursuant to subdivision (a)(5)(A) on behalf of the nonprofit organization, may sell tickets, shares, chances or similar records on the actual date of the annual event and for one hundred twenty (120) days immediately preceding the event date listed in the application and for any period after the event date listed in the annual event application but prior to the actual date of the annual event if such actual date is after the event date in accordance with subdivision (d)(1). No person shall sell tickets, shares, chances or similar records outside of the period authorized by this subdivision (d)(3). Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the secretary shall establish rules and regulations concerning modification of the actual dollar amount at which a ticket, share, chance or other similar record shall be sold by a nonprofit organization authorized to conduct an annual event; provided, that only one (1) such modification shall be made prior to the sale of any ticket, share, chance or other similar record and only in an amount within fifty dollars ($50.00) of the actual dollar amount disclosed pursuant to §3-17-104(a)(13)(B).

“(e) “(1) Within ninety (90) days following the event date listed in the annual event application, a financial accounting as required pursuant to §3-17-106 shall be submitted by the organization to the secretary.

“(2) For purposes of this chapter, the postmark date on the financial accounting shall be considered the date of submission.

“(3) The secretary shall post such accounting, or a synopsis of such accounting, on the web page of the secretary.

“(f) “(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2015, and ending June 30, 2016, a nonprofit organization described in § 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code seeking to operate an annual event for the benefit of that organization located in this state may submit an annual event application to the secretary within three (3) calendar days after this act becomes law. For purposes of this submission deadline, an annual event application shall not be considered submitted to the secretary until in the physical possession of the secretary as evidenced by the secretary's date and time endorsement on such documentation.

“(2) In addition to the omnibus list transferred to the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the house of representatives by March 1, 2015, the secretary shall transfer an additional omnibus list listing any organizations approved pursuant to subdivision (f)(1) for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2015, and ending June 30, 2016. This list shall be transferred in a manner consistent with subsection (b) by twelve o'clock noon central daylight time (CDT) within five (5) calendar days after this act becomes law.

“(g) “(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a nonprofit organization seeking to operate an annual event for the benefit of that organization located in this state that does not intend to raise gross revenue from the annual event exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall submit an annual event application to the secretary:

“(A) By December 31, 2008, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2010, and by December 31 in subsequent years, for subsequent annual event periods;

“(B) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, within fifteen (15) calendar days after May 7, 2009, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2010;

“(C) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, within fifteen (15) calendar days after March 25, 2010, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2010, and ending June 30, 2011;

“(D) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, within five (5) calendar days after March 24, 2011, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2010, and ending June 30, 2011;

“(E) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, within five (5) calendar days after March 24, 2011, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2011, and ending June 30, 2012;

“(F) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, within two (2) calendar days after April 16, 2012, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2011, and ending June 30, 2012;

“(G) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, within three (3) calendar days after April 17, 2012, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2012, and ending June 30, 2013;

“(H) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, within three (3) calendar days after April 8, 2013, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014;

“(I) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, within three (3) calendar days after March 5, 2014, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014; and

“(J) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, within three (3) calendar days after March 17, 2014, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2014, and ending June 30, 2015.

“(2) For purposes of the submission deadline provided in subdivision (f)(1)(A) or (f)(1)(I) or (f)(1)(J), an annual event application shall not be considered submitted to the secretary until in the physical possession of the secretary as evidenced by the secretary's date and time endorsement on such documentation.

“(3) For purposes of the submission deadline provided in subdivision (f)(1)(B), the postmark date on the annual event application shall be considered the date of filing.” See the amendment notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 27 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall not be construed as rescinding authorization, prohibiting or otherwise altering the requirements for annual events authorized by the One Hundred Eighth General Assembly for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014, and the annual event period beginning July 1, 2014, and ending June 30, 2015.

Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 28 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to annual event applications submitted, and annual events authorized, on and after July 1, 2014.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment by ch. 532, effective until July 1, 2014, in (a), added (1)(A)(ix) and substituted “subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ix)” for “subdivision (a)(1)(A)(viii)” in (1)(B); added (b)(9); and, in (f), added (1)(I) and substituted “subdivision (f)(1)(A) or (f)(1)(I)” for “subdivision (f)(1)(A) or (f)(1)(H)” in (2). See the Compiler's Notes.

The 2014 amendment by ch. 550, effective until July 1, 2014, in (a), added (1)(A)(x) and substituted “subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ix) or (a)(1)(A)(x)” for “subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ix)” in (1)(B); added (b)(4)(10); and, in (f), added (1)(J) and substituted “subdivision (f)(1)(A) or (f)(1)(I) or (f)(1)(J)” for “subdivision (f)(1)(A) or (f)(1)(I)” in (2). See the Compiler's Notes.

The 2014 amendment by ch. 699, effective July 1, 2014, rewrote this section. See the Compiler's Notes.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 133, redesignated the language of (a)(1)(A) as (a)(1)(A)(i) and added (a)(1)(A)(ii); rewrote (a)(1)(B), which read: “For purposes of the submission deadline, the postmark date on the annual event application shall be considered the date of submission.”; designated the existing provisions of (b) as (b)(1); and added (b)(2).

The 2015 amendment by ch. 134, substituted “nonprofit” for “501(c)(3)” throughout the section; inserted “organization” in (a)(4)(A)(iii); and added (g).

The 2016 amendment, in (a)(6)(B), substituted “shall be disqualified from filing annual event applications for a period of five (5) years” for “shall be permanently disqualified from filing annual event applications” at the end of the second sentence, and substituted “a review pursuant to the procedure set forth in §3-17-105(g)” for “a review and appeal pursuant to the procedures set forth in §3-17-105(g) and (h)” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2018 amendment, in (a)(1)(B), substituted “is deemed to be” for “shall be considered” preceding the proviso, substituted “subdivisions (a)(1)(A)(ii) and (iii),” for “subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ii)”, and substituted “is not deemed to be submitted” for “shall not be considered submitted”; and added (a)(1)(A)(iii) and (b)(3).

The 2020 amendment by ch 517, added (a)(1)(A)(iv); substituted “subdivisions (a)(1)(A)(ii)-(iv)” for “subdivisions (a)(1)(A)(ii) and (iii)” in (a)(1)(B); substituted “March 8” for “March 1” near the end of the first sentence of (b)(1); and added (b)(4).

The 2020 amendment by ch. 673, added (a)(1)(A)(v); in (a)(1)(B), substituted “subdivisions (a)(1)(A)(ii)-(v)” for “subdivisions (a)(1)(A)(ii)-(iv)”; added (b)(5); and added (d)(1)(A)(ii).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 532, § 6. March 5, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 550, § 6. March 17, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 28. July 1, 2014.

Acts 2015, ch. 133, § 5. April 14, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 134, § 28. April 14, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 821, § 8. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 584, § 7. March 20, 2018.

Acts 2020, ch. 517, § 7. February 27, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 673, § 5. June 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Attorney General Opinions. The provisions of T.C.A. §§3-17-102(a)(2), 103(a)(6) and 104(a)(3) do not conflict with the definition of “§ 501(c)(3) organization” as set forth in T.C.A. §3-17-101; the definition applies throughout the statute, OAG 04-072 (4/21/04).